Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-7606
Purpose of act; restrictions on use
of funds; report.

(1) The purpose of the Nebraska Health
Care Funding Act is to provide for the use of dedicated revenue for health-care-related
expenditures and administration and enforcement of the Master Settlement Agreement
as defined in section 69-2702.

(2) Any funds appropriated or distributed under the act shall not be
considered ongoing entitlements or obligations on the part of the State of
Nebraska and shall not be used to replace existing funding for existing programs.

(3) No funds appropriated or distributed under the act shall be used
for abortion, abortion counseling, referral for abortion, or research or activity
of any kind involving the use of human fetal tissue obtained in connection
with the performance of an induced abortion or involving the use of human
embryonic stem cells or for the purpose of obtaining other funding for such
use.

(4) The Department of Health and Human Services shall report annually
to the Legislature and the Governor regarding the use of funds appropriated
under the act and the outcomes achieved from such use. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1427, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 14;

Laws 2003, LB 412, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 676;

Laws 2008, LB469, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB590, § 18;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 124.